Colorado, session 2026A, SB091.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 8-70-115.5 as
follows:
8-70-115.5. Employment clarification - newspaper delivery
and distribution - application of independent contractor test.
(1) THE EMPLOYEE STATUS OF AN INDIVIDUAL ENGAGED IN THE
DELIVERY OR DISTRIBUTION OF NEWSPAPERS OR SHOPPING NEWS MUST BE
DETERMINED PURSUANT TO SECTION 8-70-115, AS CLARIFIED BY THIS
SECTION.
(2) FOR PURPOSES OF APPLYING SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION,
OPERATIONAL REQUIREMENTS INHERENT TO THE DELIVERY OR
DISTRIBUTION OF NEWSPAPERS OR SHOPPING NEWS DO NOT ALONE
CONSTITUTE SUFFICIENT EVIDENCE OF CONTROL OR DIRECTION IN THE
PERFORMANCE OF SERVICES. SUCH OPERATIONAL REQUIREMENTS MAY
INCLUDE:
(a) DESIGNATION OF A PICKUP LOCATION;
(b) ASSIGNMENT OF A GEOGRAPHIC ROUTE OR TERRITORY;
(c) REQUIREMENTS TO MEET CUSTOMER DELIVERY OR
DISTRIBUTION DEADLINES;
(d) REASONABLE QUALITY OR SAFETY STANDARDS RELATED TO
DELIVERY OR DISTRIBUTION; OR
(e) REQUIREMENTS TO MAINTAIN CONFIDENTIALITY OF
SUBSCRIBER OR CUSTOMER INFORMATION.
(3) FOR PURPOSES OF APPLYING SECTION 8-70-115 (1)(b), THE
-2- 091

ABSENCE OF A SEPARATE BUSINESS ADDRESS, BUSINESS REGISTRATION,
ADVERTISING, CAPITAL INVESTMENT, OR FORMAL BUSINESS ENTITY OR
TRADE NAME DOES NOT, BY ITSELF, PRECLUDE A FINDING THAT AN
INDIVIDUAL IS CUSTOMARILY ENGAGED IN AN INDEPENDENT TRADE,
OCCUPATION, PROFESSION, OR BUSINESS.
(4) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MODIFIES THE INDEPENDENT
CONTRACTOR TEST SET FORTH IN SECTION 8-70-115 (1).
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-70-136, amend (1)
introductory portion as follows:
8-70-136. Employment does not include - brokers.
(1) "Employment" does not include services performed by an
individual as a licensed real estate broker or as a direct seller engaged in
the trade or business of selling, or soliciting the sale of, a consumer
product in a home or in an establishment other than a permanent retail
establishment, or as an individual engaged in the trade or business of the
delivering or distribution of newspapers or shopping news, including any
services directly related to such trade or business, if:
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 8-4-101, amend (5)
as follows:
8-4-101. Definitions.
As used in this article 4, unless the context otherwise requires:
(5) (a) "Employee" means any person AN INDIVIDUAL, including
a migratory laborer, performing labor or services for the benefit of an
employer. For the purpose of this article 4, relevant factors in determining
whether a person AN INDIVIDUAL is an employee include the degree of
control the employer may or does exercise over the person INDIVIDUAL
and the degree to which the person INDIVIDUAL performs work that is the
-3- 091

primary work of the employer; except that an individual primarily free
from control and direction in the performance of the service, both under
his or her THE INDIVIDUAL'S contract for the performance of service and
in fact, and who is customarily engaged in an independent trade,
occupation, profession, or business related to the service performed is not
an "employee".
(b) THE EMPLOYEE STATUS OF AN INDIVIDUAL ENGAGED IN THE
DELIVERY OR DISTRIBUTION OF NEWSPAPERS OR SHOPPING NEWS MUST BE
DETERMINED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTIONS 8-70-115 AND 8-70-115.5.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to services provided on or after the applicable
effective date of this act.
-4- 091